Hawaii statutes.
§88-58 Prior service credit while per diem
employee. Under such rules as are adopted by board of trustees, all
members who formerly filled per diem positions after December 31, 1927, in
the various counties as road maintenance workers, shall be allowed full prior
service credit in the system for their per diem service. [L 1959, c 173, §§1,
2; am L 1960, c 22, §§2, 3; am L 1964, c 62, §2; Supp, §6-36.8; HRS §88-58; am
L 1969, c 110, pt of §1; am L 1982, c 165, §2(11)]

Attorney General Opinions

Section (1969) neither required nor permitted ERS to include
entirety of judges' per diem terms in computation of their retirement
benefits. Att. Gen. Op. 97-11.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next